Washington statutes.
RCW 7.60.140

Receivership financing.

(1) If a receiver is authorized to operate the business of a person or manage a person's property, the receiver may obtain unsecured credit and incur unsecured debt in the ordinary course of business allowable under RCW 7.60.230(1)(a) as an administrative expense of the receiver without order of the court.

(2) The court, after notice and a hearing, may authorize a receiver to obtain credit or incur indebtedness other than in the ordinary course of business. The court may allow the receiver to mortgage, pledge, hypothecate, or otherwise encumber estate property as security for repayment of any indebtedness that the receiver may incur.

[ 2004 c 165 s 16.]

NOTES:

Purpose—Captions not law—2004 c 165: See notes following RCW 7.60.005.